District of Columbia statutes.
7-1754

Manufacturer’s certification.

(a)

(1)

Each manufacturer shall submit written certification to the Mayor attesting that its cigarettes have been tested in accordance with this subchapter and meet the performance standard required under § 7-1753.

(2)

The submission shall include a description of each cigarette being certified, including the:

(A)

Brand;

(B)

Style;

(C)

Length in millimeters;

(D)

Circumference in millimeters;

(E)

Flavor, if applicable;

(F)

Filter or non-filter;

(G)

Package description, such as a soft pack or box; and

(H)

Mark required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(3)

Each cigarette certified under this subsection shall be recertified every 3 years.

(b)

(1)

Packaging for certified fire-standard-compliant cigarettes shall be marked in 8-point type or larger to indicate that the cigarettes have been tested using the test method and meet the performance standard required by this subchapter.

(2)

The manufacturer shall use only one mark and the mark used shall consist of:

(A)

The letters “FSC,” which signify that the cigarette is fire-standard-compliant; or

(B)

Any mark approved for sale in New York or another state that has enacted fire-standard-compliance standards for cigarettes that include the test method and performance standard specified in § 7-1753.

May 13, 2008, D.C. Law 17-157, § 5, 55 DCR 3703
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 235, 56 DCR 1117
This section is referenced in § 7-1752, § 7-1753, and § 7-1756.
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b)(2)(A).